Maryland, session 2025, SB0393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–147.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CARRIER” MEANS:
(I) AN INSURER;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0393*

SENATE BILL 393
(II) A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN;
(III) A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION;
(IV) A DENTAL PLAN ORGANIZATION; OR
(V) ANY OTHER PERSON THAT PROVIDES HEALTH BENEFIT
PLANS SUBJECT TO REGULATION BY THE STATE.
(3) “ENROLLEE” MEANS A PERSON ENTITLED TO HEALTH CARE
BENEFITS FROM A CARRIER.
(4) “FORMULARY” MEANS A LIST OF PRESCRIPTION DRUGS THAT IS
DEVELOPED BY A CARRIER’S PHARMACY AND THERAPEUTICS COMMITTEE OR
OTHER CLINICAL AND PHARMACY EXPERTS AND REPRESENTS THE PRESCRIPTION
DRUGS APPROVED FOR COVERAGE UNDER A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN.
(B) EACH CARRIER SHALL POST ON ITS WEBSITE AN UPDATED, ACCURATE,
AND COMPLETE FORMULARY THAT IS EASILY ACCESSIBLE TO AN ENROLLEE, A
PROSPECTIVE ENROLLEE, THE STATE, AND THE PUBLIC.
(C) (1) A FORMULARY POSTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(I) BE CLEARLY IDENTIFIED BY A LINK OR TAB ON THE
CARRIER’S WEBSITE;
(II) INCLUDE ANY TIERING STRUCTURE; AND
(III) INDICATE ANY RESTRICTIONS ON THE MANNER IN WHICH A
DRUG MAY BE OBTAINED.
(2) A CARRIER MAY NOT REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL TO CREATE OR
ACCESS AN ACCOUNT OR ENTER A POLICY NUMBER ON THE CARRIER’S WEBSITE TO
VIEW A FORMULARY POSTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) IF A CARRIER OFFERS MORE THAN ONE PRESCRIPTION DRUG BENEFIT
PLAN, THE CARRIER’S WEBSITE SHALL CLEARLY INDICATE WHICH FORMULARY
APPLIES TO WHICH PLAN.
(E) IF A CARRIER MAKES A CHANGE TO A FORMULARY DURING A PLAN YEAR,
WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE CHANGE WAS MADE, THE CARRIER SHALL:

SENATE BILL 393 3
(1) UPDATE THE FORMULARY POSTED ON THE CARRIER’S WEBSITE
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) CLEARLY AND IN BOLD TYPE INDICATE THE DATE THE CHANGE
WAS MADE AND A DESCRIPTION OF THE CHANGE ON THE CARRIER’S WEBSITE.
15–861.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BIOSIMILAR” MEANS A BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT THAT IS LICENSED
UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 262(K) AND HAS BEEN LISTED IN THE FDA’S DATABASE OF
LICENSED BIOLOGICAL PRODUCTS AS BIOSIMILAR TO OR INTERCHANGEABLE WITH
A REFERENCE PRODUCT.
(3) “BRAND DRUG” MEANS A DRUG FOR WHICH AN APPLICATION HAS
BEEN APPROVED UNDER 21 U.S.C. § 355(C) OR A BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT OTHER
THAN A BIOSIMILAR THAT IS LICENSED UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 262(A).
(4) “FDA” MEANS THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION.
(5) “FORMULARY” MEANS A LIST OF PRESCRIPTION DRUGS THAT IS
DEVELOPED BY A CARRIER’S PHARMACY AND THERAPEUTICS COMMITTEE OR
OTHER CLINICAL AND PHARMACY EXPERTS AND REPRESENTS THE PRESCRIPTION
DRUGS APPROVED FOR COVERAGE UNDER A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN.
(6) “GENERIC DRUG” MEANS A DRUG FOR WHICH AN APPLICATION
HAS BEEN APPROVED UNDER 21 U.S.C. § 355(J) AND THAT HAS BEEN LISTED IN THE
FDA’S APPROVED DRUG PRODUCTS WITH THERAPEUTIC EQUIVALENCE
EVALUATIONS AS THERAPEUTICALLY EQUIVALENT TO A REFERENCE LISTED DRUG,
INCLUDING A DRUG TO WHICH THE MANUFACTURER OF THE DRUG APPLIES A TRADE
NAME.
(7) “REFERENCE LISTED DRUG” MEANS A PREVIOUSLY APPROVED
DRUG IDENTIFIED BY THE FDA AS THE DRUG PRODUCT TO WHICH A PROPOSED
GENERIC DRUG MUST BE COMPARED ON AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED FOR
APPROVAL UNDER 21 U.S.C. § 355(J).
(8) “REFERENCE PRODUCT” MEANS A SINGLE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT
THAT IS LICENSED BY THE FDA UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 262(A) AGAINST WHICH A
PROPOSED BIOSIMILAR OR INTERCHANGEABLE PRODUCT IS COMPARED AND THAT

SENATE BILL 393
IS LISTED AS A REFERENCE PRODUCT IN THE FDA’S DATABASE OF LICENSED
BIOLOGICAL PRODUCTS.
(9) “WHOLESALE ACQUISITION COST” MEANS, WITH RESPECT TO A
DRUG OR BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT, THE MANUFACTURER’S LIST PRICE FOR THE DRUG
OR THE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT TO WHOLESALERS OR DIRECT PURCHASERS IN THE
UNITED STATES, NOT INCLUDING PROMPT PAY OR OTHER DISCOUNTS, REBATES, OR
REDUCTIONS IN PRICE, FOR THE MOST RECENT MONTH FOR WHICH THE
INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE AS REPORTED IN WHOLESALE PRICE GUIDES OR OTHER
PUBLICATIONS OF DRUG OR BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT PRICING DATA.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(I) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AND DEVICES TO INDIVIDUALS OR
GROUPS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR CONTRACTS THAT ARE
DELIVERED IN THE STATE;
(II) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AND DEVICES TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
UNDER CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(III) INSURERS, NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS, OR
HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AND DEVICES THROUGH A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION AS DEFINED IN § 15–101 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION THAT PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR THE
REFERENCE LISTED DRUG FOR A GENERIC DRUG SHALL IMMEDIATELY MAKE THE
GENERIC DRUG AVAILABLE ON A FORMULARY WITH MORE FAVORABLE COST
SHARING THAN THE REFERENCE LISTED DRUG IF THE GENERIC DRUG:
(I) IS APPROVED BY THE FDA;
(II) IS MARKETED AS A GENERIC DRUG APPROVED BY THE FDA;
AND
(III) HAS A WHOLESALE ACQUISITION COST THAT IS LESS THAN
THE WHOLESALE ACQUISITION COST OF THE REFERENCE LISTED DRUG ON THE
INITIAL DATE OF MARKETING FOR THE GENERIC DRUG.

SENATE BILL 393 5
(2) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE:
(I) A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION OR STEP THERAPY REQUIREMENT
OR OTHER LIMITATION ON THE COVERAGE FOR A GENERIC DRUG ADDED TO A
FORMULARY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; OR
(II) A RESTRICTION ON A PHARMACY THAT MAKES IT MORE
DIFFICULT FOR AN ENROLLEE TO OBTAIN COVERAGE FOR OR ACCESS TO A GENERIC
DRUG ADDED TO A FORMULARY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAN
IT IS FOR THE ENROLLEE TO OBTAIN COVERAGE FOR OR ACCESS TO THE REFERENCE
LISTED DRUG.
(3) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE WHOLESALE
ACQUISITION COST OF THE GENERIC DRUG BECOMES GREATER THAN THE
WHOLESALE ACQUISITION COST OF THE REFERENCE LISTED DRUG.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION THAT PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR A
REFERENCE PRODUCT FOR A BIOSIMILAR SHALL IMMEDIATELY MAKE AT LEAST ONE
BIOSIMILAR FOR THE REFERENCE PRODUCT AVAILABLE ON THE ENTITY’S
FORMULARY WITH MORE FAVORABLE COST SHARING THAN THE REFERENCE
PRODUCT IF THE BIOSIMILAR:
(I) IS LICENSED BY THE FDA;
(II) IS MARKETED AS A BIOSIMILAR LICENSED BY THE FDA; AND
(III) HAS A WHOLESALE ACQUISITION COST THAT IS LESS THAN
THE WHOLESALE ACQUISITION COST OF THE REFERENCE PRODUCT ON THE INITIAL
DATE OF MARKETING FOR THE BIOSIMILAR.
(2) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE:
(I) A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION OR STEP THERAPY REQUIREMENT
OR OTHER LIMITATION ON THE COVERAGE FOR A BIOSIMILAR ADDED TO A
FORMULARY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; OR
(II) A RESTRICTION ON A PHARMACY THAT MAKES IT MORE
DIFFICULT FOR AN ENROLLEE TO OBTAIN COVERAGE FOR OR ACCESS TO A
BIOSIMILAR ADDED TO A FORMULARY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
THAN IT IS FOR THE ENROLLEE TO OBTAIN COVERAGE FOR OR ACCESS TO THE
REFERENCE PRODUCT.

SENATE BILL 393
(3) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE WHOLESALE
ACQUISITION COST OF THE BIOSIMILAR BECOMES GREATER THAN THE WHOLESALE
ACQUISITION COST OF THE REFERENCE PRODUCT.
(E) IF A GENERIC DRUG IS ADDED TO A FORMULARY UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION OR A BIOSIMILAR IS ADDED TO A FORMULARY UNDER SUBSECTION
(D) OF THIS SECTION, AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL INFORM
ENROLLEES OF THE CHANGE IN FORMULARY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–147 OF
THIS TITLE.
(F) THIS SECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS
SECTION TO PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR A BRAND DRUG AFTER A GENERIC DRUG IS
APPROVED BY THE FDA OR A BIOSIMILAR IS LICENSED BY THE FDA AND
MARKETED, AS APPLICABLE.
(G) THIS SECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS
SECTION TO PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR A BRAND DRUG, GENERIC DRUG, OR
BIOSIMILAR IF THE PHARMACY AND THERAPEUTICS COMMITTEE OR OTHER
CLINICAL AND PHARMACY EXPERTS THAT DEVELOP THE ENTITY’S FORMULARY
DETERMINE THAT THE BRAND DRUG, GENERIC DRUG, OR BIOSIMILAR IS NO LONGER
MEDICALLY APPROPRIATE OR COST–EFFECTIVE.
(H) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO INTERFERE WITH A
PHARMACIST COMPLYING WITH THE MARYLAND PHARMACY ACT.
(I) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.